South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4010.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Clean Air Act." SECTION 2.  Section 48-1-110(e) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (e)(1) It shall beis unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, negligently or willfullywilfully, to discharge any air contaminant or other substance in the ambient air that shall cause an undesirablea hazardous level. (2)(A) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally inject, release, or disperse, by any means, chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus and energy frequencies manipulation within the borders of the State in the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of storms and the dimming of the sunlight. The prohibitions of this item include the manipulation of weather systems in storing through the means of aerosol injection chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus for the purpose of intensifying the weather for any reason to harm persons or to destroy or damage tree farms or other property. (B) The provisions of this item do not apply to any person whose cloud seeding is a result of a publicly approved contract or a person that is lawfully crop dusting. (3) The Department of Environmental Services must make information available to the public detailing the harmful effects to a person's health and personal property that result from chemicals being released into the atmosphere. No exemption to the state Freedom of Information Act prohibits the release of documents, reports, and other records relating to stratospheric aerosol injection or any other prohibited conduct, upon request. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----